Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE F. OTHER COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES

CHAPTER 102. WEST TEXAS STATE UNIVERSITY

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 102.01. WEST TEXAS STATE UNIVERSITY. West Texas State University is a coeducational institution of higher education located in the city of Canyon.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3230, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER B. ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS

Sec. 102.11. BOARD OF REGENTS. The organization, control, and management of the university is vested in a board of nine regents appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate. The members of the board shall be selected from different portions of the state.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3230, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 756, ch. 331, Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 1973.

Sec. 102.111. TRANSFER OF GOVERNANCE TO TEXAS A&M SYSTEM. (a) The organization, control, and management of the university are transferred to the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System if that board and the board of regents appointed for the university under Section 102.11 of this code agree on the transfer not later than December 31, 1989, and the transfer is approved by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board not later than March 31, 1990. The transfer takes effect on the date agreed to by the boards and approved by the coordinating board.

(b) If the transfer is agreed to and approved under Subsection (a) of this section, the governance, operation, management, and control of the university, along with all right, title, and interest in the land, buildings, facilities, improvements, equipment, supplies, and property comprising that institution are transferred from the board of regents appointed under Section 102.11 of this code to the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System. The board of regents appointed under Section 102.11 of this code is abolished on the effective date of the transfer.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 9, Sec. 1, eff. Nov. 1, 1989.

Sec. 102.12. TERMS; VACANCIES. The members of the board hold office for staggered terms of six years, with the terms of three members expiring each two years. Any vacancy that occurs on the board shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment of the governor.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3231, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 102.13. OATH. Each member of the board shall take the constitutional oath of office before assuming the duties of his office.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3231, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 102.14. REMOVAL. The members of the board are removable by the governor for inefficiency or malfeasance of office.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3231, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 102.15. OFFICERS. The board shall elect a chairman and any other officers it deems necessary.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3231, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 102.16. MEETINGS. The chairman of the board may convene the board to consider any business connected with the university whenever he deems it expedient.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3231, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 102.31. EXTENT OF POWERS. With respect to the management and control of the university, the board has the same powers and duties that are conferred on the Board of Regents, State Senior Colleges, with respect to institutions in that system.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3231, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 102.32. LEASE OF LANDS TO FRATERNITIES AND SORORITIES. (a) The board may lease portions of the state-owned land held for the use and benefit of the university in the city of Canyon to fraternities and sororities for the purpose of constructing chapter houses.

(b) A lease may be for any term of years less than 100, and the consideration and terms may be determined by the board, consistent with the best interests of the university. The chairman of the board, with approval of a majority of the board, may execute all documents necessary to consummate the leasing.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3231, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 102.33. AIRPORT. The university may own and operate an airport, may accept federal aid and money for those purposes, and may enter into sponsor's assurance agreements with the federal government. It may operate the airport separately or in cooperation with a city, a county, the state, or the federal government, with the approval of the appropriate governing body, but without any expense to or liability against the state in any manner.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3231, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 102.35. DONATION AND CONSTRUCTION OF BUILDING FOR MUSEUM PURPOSES. The board may accept the donation from the Panhandle-Plains Historical Society of a building to be constructed for the benefit of the Panhandle-Plains Historical Museum. The building may be constructed, and existing buildings may be modified to connect with the new structure.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 111, ch. 53, Sec. 1, eff. April 15, 1981.

SUBCHAPTER D. KILLGORE RESEARCH CENTER

Sec. 102.51. GIFTS AND DONATIONS; LOCATION OF CENTER. The board may accept gifts and donations of money and other personal property from the Killgore Foundation and from any other private organization or individual to establish, construct, maintain, and operate a regional center to be known as the Killgore Research Center, on any land held by the board for the use of the university.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3232, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 102.52. TRANSFER OF MONEY; DISBURSEMENTS. All money so received shall be transferred as soon as available to the West Texas State University Foundation or to any other fund or foundation chosen by agreement between the donors and the administration of the university. The disbursement of all this money is under the supervision of the business manager of the university.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3232, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 59, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 102.53. MAINTENANCE AND ADMINISTRATION. The maintenance and administration of the research center is the responsibility of the State of Texas acting through the administration of the university, with the advice and assistance of an advisory council on research selected by the administration and the donors.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3232, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 102.54. PERMANENT RESEARCH PROGRAM. In order to provide for a permanent research program, the administration of the university may:

(1) establish formalized working relationships with established research programs similar to the relationship already developed between the university and The University of Texas M. D. Anderson Cancer Center;

(2) integrate the research program being developed in the graduate school of the university with a research program at the research center;

(3) employ project directors who are recognized researchers and who have had experience in applying for and using research grants from governmental agencies and private foundations;

(4) assign a person from the administrative staff of the university as administrator of the research center; and

(5) perform any other acts and make any agreements which will implement and further the research programs of the research center and the university, consistent with the purposes of this subchapter.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3232, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 644, Sec. 11, eff. June 14, 1989.